Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.108.040

Award of scholarships—Amount—Duration.

The office may award scholarships to eligible students from moneys earned from the endowment fund created in RCW 28B.108.060, or from funds appropriated to the council for this purpose, or from any private donations, or from any other funds given to the council for this program. For an undergraduate student, the amount of the scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated financial need. For a graduate student, the amount of the scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated need; or the stipend of a teaching assistant, including tuition, at the University of Washington; whichever is higher. In calculating a student's need, the office shall consider the student's costs for tuition, fees, books, supplies, transportation, room, board, personal expenses, and child care. The student's scholarship awarded under this chapter shall not exceed the amount received by a student attending a state research university. A student is eligible to receive a scholarship for a maximum of five years. However, the length of the scholarship shall be determined at the discretion of the office.

[ 2012 c 229 s 564; 1990 c 287 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.